Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-104 Claims against decedent;
necessity of administration. No proceeding to enforce a claim
against the estate of a decedent or the decedent's successors may be revived or
commenced before the appointment of a personal representative. After the appointment
and until distribution, all proceedings and actions to enforce a claim against
the estate are governed by the procedure prescribed by this article. After
distribution, a creditor whose claim has not been barred may recover from the
distributees as provided in section 560:3-1004 or from a former personal
representative individually liable as provided in section 560:3-1005. This
section has no application to a proceeding by a secured creditor of the
decedent to enforce the creditor's right to the creditor's security except as
to any deficiency judgment which might be sought therein. [L 1996, c 288, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next